Massachusetts, session 194th, H2759.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, the state board of retirement shall credit Paul Lemelin, an employee of the Franklin
Regional Council of Governments, with creditable service for the service he rendered during the
period of November 14, 2011 to January 20, 2023, inclusive, for the purpose of determining his
superannuation retirement allowance pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 5 of
chapter 32 of the General Laws. Before the date that any retirement allowance becomes effective
in the case of Paul Lemelin, Paul Lemelin shall pay to the state employees’ retirement system, in
1 lump sum or in installments, upon such terms and conditions as the state board of retirement
may prescribe, an amount equal to the amount that would have been withheld under said chapter
32 if he had received regular compensation during the applicable period at the annual rate of
of 2

regular compensation that he was receiving immediately before this period, plus buyback
interest.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.



of 2